Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 41 Administrative Payment of Certain Traffic Offenses [Repealed.]

31-41-1 — 31-41-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 177, §§ 1, 3; P.L. 1975, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 217, § 3; P.L. 1978, ch. 383, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 385, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 386, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 189, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 143, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 159, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 267, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 326, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 161, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 40; P.L. 1986, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 344, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 403, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 541, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 569, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 486, § 2; P.L 1989, ch. 542, § 86; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 57, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 322, § 4; P.L. 1991, ch. 303, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 488, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 134, § 20; P.L. 1996, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 36, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 1999, except for § 31-41-4, which was repealed effective October 1, 1999.